Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3948
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-3948 to 2-3963 shall be known and may be cited as the Dairy Industry Development Act.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 194, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 836, § 1.